Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.010

GET ready for math and science scholarship program—Purpose—Awards.

(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship program is established. The purpose of the program is to provide scholarships to students who achieve level four on the mathematics or science portions of the high school statewide student assessment or achieve a score in the math section of the SAT or the math section of the ACT that is above the ninety-fifth percentile, major in a mathematics, science, or related field in college, and commit to working in mathematics, science, or a related field for at least three years in Washington following completion of their bachelor's degree. The program shall be administered by the nonprofit organization selected as the private partner in the public-private partnership.

(2) The total annual amount of each GET ready for math and science scholarship may vary, but shall not exceed the annual cost of resident undergraduate tuition fees and mandatory fees at the University of Washington. An eligible recipient may receive a GET ready for math and science scholarship for up to one hundred eighty quarter credits, or the semester equivalent, or for up to five years, whichever comes first.

(3) Scholarships shall be awarded only to the extent that state funds and private matching funds are available for that purpose in the GET ready for math and science scholarship account established in RCW 28B.105.110.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 10; 2007 c 214 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: See note following RCW 28A.655.068.